Washington statutes.
RCW 10.91.030

Preliminary hearing—Investigation report—Findings—Order authorizing return.

The prosecuting attorney shall appear at the hearing and report to the judicial officer the results of his or her investigation. If the judicial officer finds that the affiant is a designated agent of the demanding court, judge, or magistrate and that the person whose removal is sought was released from custody by the demanding court, judge, or magistrate, and that the person has violated the terms or conditions of his or her release, the judicial officer shall issue an order authorizing the return of the person to the custody of the demanding court, judge, or magistrate forthwith.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1091; 1971 ex.s. c 17 s 4.]